ug.aff
FLAG num
SFX 12778 N 1
SFX 12778 0 مىلىك .

SFX 12779 N 1
SFX 12779 0 يسا .

SFX 12780 N 1
SFX 12780 0 ەتلەشمەك .

SFX 12781 N 1
SFX 12781 0 ېرىكى .

SFX 12782 N 1
SFX 12782 0 سسا .

SFX 12783 N 1
SFX 12783 0 سلارمۇ .

SFX 12784 N 1
SFX 12784 0 كو .

SFX 12785 N 1
SFX 12785 0 ەشكەر .

SFX 12786 N 1
SFX 12786 0 زگەندە .

SFX 12787 N 1
SFX 12787 0 ەقتە .

SFX 12788 N 1
SFX 12788 0 لاپتۇ .

SFX 12789 N 1
SFX 12789 0 ۋالغۇم .

SFX 12790 N 1
SFX 12790 0 ىرىش .

SFX 12791 N 1
SFX 12791 0 ىزىدە .

SFX 12792 N 1
SFX 12792 0 شىمنى .

SFX 12793 N 1
SFX 12793 0 رتىل .

SFX 12794 N 1
SFX 12794 0 ازنىڭ .

SFX 12795 N 1
SFX 12795 0 ەتچىلىكنىڭ .

SFX 12796 N 1
SFX 12796 0 ەلەر .

SFX 12797 N 1
SFX 12797 0 چىياڭ .

SFX 12798 N 1
SFX 12798 0 لاشتۇرغان .

SFX 12799 N 1
SFX 12799 0 ۇنلۇقتا .

SFX 12800 N 1
SFX 12800 0 يىنى .

SFX 12801 N 1
SFX 12801 0 ېتىغا .

SFX 12802 N 1
SFX 12802 0 مچىئوت .

SFX 12803 N 1
SFX 12803 0 كمەك .

SFX 12804 N 1
SFX 12804 0 مىسكىن .

SFX 12805 N 1
SFX 12805 0 انلارغا .

SFX 12806 N 1
SFX 12806 0 ۋالىسەن .

SFX 12807 N 1
SFX 12807 0 ىپىنىڭ .

SFX 12808 N 1
SFX 12808 0 ۈرۈشنىڭ .

SFX 12809 N 1
SFX 12809 0 سىيسى .

SFX 12810 N 1
SFX 12810 0 رۇپ .

SFX 12811 N 1
SFX 12811 0 ىنىشتەك .

SFX 12812 N 1
SFX 12812 0 ۈچىنىڭ .

SFX 12813 N 1
SFX 12813 0 خاندەك .

SFX 12814 N 1
SFX 12814 0 ەيسىزلەر .

SFX 12815 N 1
SFX 12815 0 گاھىغا .

SFX 12816 N 1
SFX 12816 0 رۈن .

SFX 12817 N 1
SFX 12817 0 زلاش .

SFX 12818 N 1
SFX 12818 0 مەر .

SFX 12819 N 1
SFX 12819 0 نۇسلار .

SFX 12820 N 1
SFX 12820 0 لاركەن .

SFX 12821 N 1
SFX 12821 0 ىرىكەن .

SFX 12822 N 1
SFX 12822 0 شار .

SFX 12823 N 1
SFX 12823 0 قلىقىم .

SFX 12824 N 1
SFX 12824 0 شىمىزچە .

SFX 12825 N 1
SFX 12825 0 رۇسنىڭ .

SFX 12826 N 1
SFX 12826 0 پۇش .

SFX 12827 N 1
SFX 12827 0 مىمنى .

SFX 12828 N 1
SFX 12828 0 ارىڭنى .

SFX 12829 N 1
SFX 12829 0 يەلەرنىڭ .

SFX 12830 N 1
SFX 12830 0 اپا .

SFX 12831 N 1
SFX 12831 0 نكو .

SFX 12832 N 1
SFX 12832 0 روفىل .

SFX 12833 N 1
SFX 12833 0 تىپىنى .

SFX 12834 N 1
SFX 12834 0 بىدە .

SFX 12835 N 1
SFX 12835 0 ۇشتىكى .

SFX 12836 N 1
SFX 12836 0 ىقلىقى .

SFX 12837 N 1
SFX 12837 0 ىغا .

SFX 12838 N 1
SFX 12838 0 لىرىمنىڭ .

SFX 12839 N 1
SFX 12839 0 سىزلىقى .

SFX 12840 N 1
SFX 12840 0 لىتىشىش .

SFX 12841 N 1
SFX 12841 0 ايلا .

SFX 12842 N 1
SFX 12842 0 تلانتىك .

SFX 12843 N 1
SFX 12843 0 ىلىرىمىزنىڭ .

SFX 12844 N 1
SFX 12844 0 اشتۇرغىلى .

SFX 12845 N 1
SFX 12845 0 لدىڭ .

SFX 12846 N 1
SFX 12846 0 نغان .

SFX 12847 N 1
SFX 12847 0 الىقلارنىڭ .

SFX 12848 N 1
SFX 12848 0 ارچى .

SFX 12849 N 1
SFX 12849 0 مەمسەن .

SFX 12850 N 1
SFX 12850 0 بىيون .

SFX 12851 N 1
SFX 12851 0 لاسنى .

SFX 12852 N 1
SFX 12852 0 كىر .

SFX 12853 N 1
SFX 12853 0 الغاندەكلا .

SFX 12854 N 1
SFX 12854 0 اشلاتماق .

SFX 12855 N 1
SFX 12855 0 سكوپىيە .

SFX 12856 N 1
SFX 12856 0 دۇرسا .

SFX 12857 N 1
SFX 12857 0 لەنگەنلىكى .

SFX 12858 N 1
SFX 12858 0 ېلنى .

SFX 12859 N 1
SFX 12859 0 ەتسەك .

SFX 12860 N 1
SFX 12860 0 يىشىغا .

SFX 12861 N 1
SFX 12861 0 گۈچە .

SFX 12862 N 1
SFX 12862 0 زىقلىرى .

SFX 12863 N 1
SFX 12863 0 لمەيدىغانلىقىنى .

SFX 12864 N 1
SFX 12864 0 رلاردەك .

SFX 12865 N 1
SFX 12865 0 قلاپ .

SFX 12866 N 1
SFX 12866 0 ۈرۈشۈش .

SFX 12867 N 1
SFX 12867 0 ەتلىرىنى .

SFX 12868 N 1
SFX 12868 0 ەتلەس .

SFX 12869 N 1
SFX 12869 0 ۈككە .

SFX 12870 N 1
SFX 12870 0 تلىغان .

SFX 12871 N 1
SFX 12871 0 اكتا .

SFX 12872 N 1
SFX 12872 0 ىزلەشمەك .

SFX 12873 N 1
SFX 12873 0 سىزلار .

SFX 12874 N 1
SFX 12874 0 پلارنى .

SFX 12875 N 1
SFX 12875 0 ىلىكلىرى .

SFX 12876 N 1
SFX 12876 0 ەيسىلەر .

SFX 12877 N 1
SFX 12877 0 ۇشىمىزنى .

SFX 12878 N 1
SFX 12878 0 ەدىقە .

SFX 12879 N 1
SFX 12879 0 رىتىش .

SFX 12880 N 1
SFX 12880 0 لىغۇم .

SFX 12881 N 1
SFX 12881 0 پلىرىدىن .

SFX 12882 N 1
SFX 12882 0 لىشنى .

SFX 12883 N 1
SFX 12883 0 گەنلەرمۇ .

SFX 12884 N 1
SFX 12884 0 قۇسى .

SFX 12885 N 1
SFX 12885 0 دىكىن .

SFX 12886 N 1
SFX 12886 0 كۈپ .

SFX 12887 N 1
SFX 12887 0 لاشتۇرۇشقا .

SFX 12888 N 1
SFX 12888 0 تېخنىكىلىق .

SFX 12889 N 1
SFX 12889 0 غۇچنىڭ .

SFX 12890 N 1
SFX 12890 0 ركىن .

SFX 12891 N 1
SFX 12891 0 ەتچىلەر .

SFX 12892 N 1
SFX 12892 0 نلۇقنىڭ .

SFX 12893 N 1
SFX 12893 0 نىپلا .

SFX 12894 N 1
SFX 12894 0 ىتىشماق .

SFX 12895 N 1
SFX 12895 0 ەتتىمۇ .

SFX 12896 N 1
SFX 12896 0 ساسەن .

SFX 12897 N 1
SFX 12897 0 ملا .

SFX 12898 N 1
SFX 12898 0 مچىلىقتىن .

SFX 12899 N 1
SFX 12899 0 ۇلغاندا .

SFX 12900 N 1
SFX 12900 0 بلىرىدىن .

SFX 12901 N 1
SFX 12901 0 ىنوس .

SFX 12902 N 1
SFX 12902 0 ىرانىڭ .

SFX 12903 N 1
SFX 12903 0 انلىقىغا .

SFX 12904 N 1
SFX 12904 0 المىغانىدى .

SFX 12905 N 1
SFX 12905 0 سمەن .

SFX 12906 N 1
SFX 12906 0 ايىتى .

SFX 12907 N 1
SFX 12907 0 ىدىغانلىقىمىزنى .

SFX 12908 N 1
SFX 12908 0 رغۇ .

SFX 12909 N 1
SFX 12909 0 المىسىمۇ .

SFX 12910 N 1
SFX 12910 0 رىلىرى .

SFX 12911 N 1
SFX 12911 0 ەنلىرىمنى .

SFX 12912 N 1
SFX 12912 0 ۈچتە .

SFX 12913 N 1
SFX 12913 0 تەكتىن .

SFX 12914 N 1
SFX 12914 0 چقىمىكىن .

SFX 12915 N 1
SFX 12915 0 ۇمدا .

SFX 12916 N 1
SFX 12916 0 ۇردىكى .

SFX 12917 N 1
SFX 12917 0 سلىكىڭىزنى .

SFX 12918 N 1
SFX 12918 0 لۋۇر .

SFX 12919 N 1
SFX 12919 0 اتقاندىكى .

SFX 12920 N 1
SFX 12920 0 -كېچەك .

SFX 12921 N 1
SFX 12921 0 قىلدىتىش .

SFX 12922 N 1
SFX 12922 0 ۇلاق .

SFX 12923 N 1
SFX 12923 0 اتقىنىدىن .

SFX 12924 N 1
SFX 12924 0 ېقىن .

SFX 12925 N 1
SFX 12925 0 ناسى .

SFX 12926 N 1
SFX 12926 0 ىغىنا .

SFX 12927 N 1
SFX 12927 0 غانسىلەر .

SFX 12928 N 1
SFX 12928 0 تۇرۇشىغا .

SFX 12929 N 1
SFX 12929 0 ۇقلىشىش .

SFX 12930 N 1
SFX 12930 0 اللىرىغا .

SFX 12931 N 1
SFX 12931 0 ىسى .

SFX 12932 N 1
SFX 12932 0 كەنلەردىن .

SFX 12933 N 1
SFX 12933 0 ياتلىرى .

SFX 12934 N 1
SFX 12934 0 لمايدىغان .

SFX 12935 N 1
SFX 12935 0 ىردىن .

SFX 12936 N 1
SFX 12936 0 اجغا .

SFX 12937 N 1
SFX 12937 0 مىلار .

SFX 12938 N 1
SFX 12938 0 گىلى .

SFX 12939 N 1
SFX 12939 0 ان .

SFX 12940 N 1
SFX 12940 0 لگۈچە .

SFX 12941 N 1
SFX 12941 0 يىتىدىكى .

SFX 12942 N 1
SFX 12942 0 مىغاندەك .

SFX 12943 N 1
SFX 12943 0 ىغايلا .

SFX 12944 N 1
SFX 12944 0 اشات .

SFX 12945 N 1
SFX 12945 0 فارماكولوگىيە .

SFX 12946 N 1
SFX 12946 0 سىردىن .

SFX 12947 N 1
SFX 12947 0 جىگدە .

SFX 12948 N 1
SFX 12948 0 نىقى .

SFX 12949 N 1
SFX 12949 0 ەتمىسەم .

SFX 12950 N 1
SFX 12950 0 ېندا .

SFX 12951 N 1
SFX 12951 0 پاچاق .

SFX 12952 N 1
SFX 12952 0 مسىلە .

SFX 12953 N 1
SFX 12953 0 اشتۇرۇشى .

SFX 12954 N 1
SFX 12954 0 ارسىزمۇ .

SFX 12955 N 1
SFX 12955 0 ۇستانى .

SFX 12956 N 1
SFX 12956 0 خمان .

SFX 12957 N 1
SFX 12957 0 ىماستىن .

SFX 12958 N 1
SFX 12958 0 مىزما .

SFX 12959 N 1
SFX 12959 0 ۆكىنى .

SFX 12960 N 1
SFX 12960 0 يانى .

SFX 12961 N 1
SFX 12961 0 نىمغا .

SFX 12962 N 1
SFX 12962 0 سەنگە .

SFX 12963 N 1
SFX 12963 0 ۈكىنى .

SFX 12964 N 1
SFX 12964 0 ېندىكى .

SFX 12965 N 1
SFX 12965 0 رىلەرنى .

SFX 12966 N 1
SFX 12966 0 ۇمىدا .

SFX 12967 N 1
SFX 12967 0 چىلىكىمۇ .

SFX 12968 N 1
SFX 12968 0 يەلەردە .

SFX 12969 N 1
SFX 12969 0 ئابدال .

SFX 12970 N 1
SFX 12970 0 قلۇقنىڭ .

SFX 12971 N 1
SFX 12971 0 رەكلىرىنى .

SFX 12972 N 1
SFX 12972 0 سىدىكى .

SFX 12973 N 1
SFX 12973 0 رقىماق .

SFX 12974 N 1
SFX 12974 0 ىدىغانلىرىنى .

SFX 12975 N 1
SFX 12975 0 داننىڭ .

SFX 12976 N 1
SFX 12976 0 ماسلىقنى .

SFX 12977 N 1
SFX 12977 0 ندىقىنى .

SFX 12978 N 1
SFX 12978 0 نتتىن .

SFX 12979 N 1
SFX 12979 0 ەپلىمەك .

SFX 12980 N 1
SFX 12980 0 ىيەنى .

SFX 12981 N 1
SFX 12981 0 ۇلنىڭ .

SFX 12982 N 1
SFX 12982 0 يلانماق .

SFX 12983 N 1
SFX 12983 0 غۇچنى .

SFX 12984 N 1
SFX 12984 0 قىلىرىنىڭ .

SFX 12985 N 1
SFX 12985 0 شىملىق .

SFX 12986 N 1
SFX 12986 0 نجى .

SFX 12987 N 1
SFX 12987 0 تىكىدەك .

SFX 12988 N 1
SFX 12988 0 ىنىشىنىڭ .

SFX 12989 N 1
SFX 12989 0 بولا .

SFX 12990 N 1
SFX 12990 0 للىقىغا .

SFX 12991 N 1
SFX 12991 0 چانلىقتىن .

SFX 12992 N 1
SFX 12992 0 سلىقىمۇ .

SFX 12993 N 1
SFX 12993 0 قلاشتۇرماق .

SFX 12994 N 1
SFX 12994 0 اپ .

SFX 12995 N 1
SFX 12995 0 كۆيۈپ .

SFX 12996 N 1
SFX 12996 0 بىمۇ .

SFX 12997 N 1
SFX 12997 0 تتىمكەن .

SFX 12998 N 1
SFX 12998 0 لەندۈرمەك .

SFX 12999 N 1
SFX 12999 0 كىمىز .

SFX 13000 N 1
SFX 13000 0 زلاردىن .

SFX 13001 N 1
SFX 13001 0 چەينەك .

SFX 13002 N 1
SFX 13002 0 ۈندىكى .

SFX 13003 N 1
SFX 13003 0 قىسىز .

SFX 13004 N 1
SFX 13004 0 كخانا .

SFX 13005 N 1
SFX 13005 0 ۇقى .

SFX 13006 N 1
SFX 13006 0 قىنىڭنى .

SFX 13007 N 1
SFX 13007 0 قۇزماق .

SFX 13008 N 1
SFX 13008 0 سلىقىدىن .

SFX 13009 N 1
SFX 13009 0 ىيىتىنى .

SFX 13010 N 1
SFX 13010 0 لىۋېلىش .

SFX 13011 N 1
SFX 13011 0 -سالا .

SFX 13012 N 1
SFX 13012 0 ىلگەندەك .

SFX 13013 N 1
SFX 13013 0 ېتلىرى .

SFX 13014 N 1
SFX 13014 0 تلاتماق .

SFX 13015 N 1
SFX 13015 0 دارلارنى .

SFX 13016 N 1
SFX 13016 0 ېسەر .

SFX 13017 N 1
SFX 13017 0 ۇلاقنىڭ .

SFX 13018 N 1
SFX 13018 0 سلىقلار .

SFX 13019 N 1
SFX 13019 0 انىيلار .

SFX 13020 N 1
SFX 13020 0 اتقىنى .

SFX 13021 N 1
SFX 13021 0 تىلدات .

SFX 13022 N 1
SFX 13022 0 ەينەك .

SFX 13023 N 1
SFX 13023 0 تىپلىرىنى .

SFX 13024 N 1
SFX 13024 0 گىنىڭىزدىن .

SFX 13025 N 1
SFX 13025 0 پلىقىنى .

SFX 13026 N 1
SFX 13026 0 ردە .

SFX 13027 N 1
SFX 13027 0 ېلىيە .

SFX 13028 N 1
SFX 13028 0 ەشتۈرىدۇ .

SFX 13029 N 1
SFX 13029 0 ركا .

SFX 13030 N 1
SFX 13030 0 زلىكىنى .

SFX 13031 N 1
SFX 13031 0 ېلىننىڭ .

SFX 13032 N 1
SFX 13032 0 شتۈرۈلۈشى .

SFX 13033 N 1
SFX 13033 0 ەيلەنمۇ .

SFX 13034 N 1
SFX 13034 0 تىنمۇ .

SFX 13035 N 1
SFX 13035 0 اتقانىدى .

SFX 13036 N 1
SFX 13036 0 كىتىنىڭ .

SFX 13037 N 1
SFX 13037 0 كىكەن .

SFX 13038 N 1
SFX 13038 0 دىشىم .

SFX 13039 N 1
SFX 13039 0 شۈمگە .

SFX 13040 N 1
SFX 13040 0 تمەن .

SFX 13041 N 1
SFX 13041 0 اپانلار .

SFX 13042 N 1
SFX 13042 0 الدى .

SFX 13043 N 1
SFX 13043 0 رەمۇ .

SFX 13044 N 1
SFX 13044 0 رخانا .

SFX 13045 N 1
SFX 13045 0 ىككەن .

SFX 13046 N 1
SFX 13046 0 ەتلىرىڭىزگە .

SFX 13047 N 1
SFX 13047 0 ىيلەرنىڭ .

SFX 13048 N 1
SFX 13048 0 ەرمەس .

SFX 13049 N 1
SFX 13049 0 لىقسىز .

SFX 13050 N 1
SFX 13050 0 لغۇچى .

SFX 13051 N 1
SFX 13051 0 ىنىۋاتىمەن .

SFX 13052 N 1
SFX 13052 0 زەلىك .

SFX 13053 N 1
SFX 13053 0 تېر .

SFX 13054 N 1
SFX 13054 0 شلارنى .

SFX 13055 N 1
SFX 13055 0 ۈرۈشىمىز .

SFX 13056 N 1
SFX 13056 0 ەيدى .

SFX 13057 N 1
SFX 13057 0 ىدىغۇ .

SFX 13058 N 1
SFX 13058 0 لىقكى .

SFX 13059 N 1
SFX 13059 0 مىگەندە .

SFX 13060 N 1
SFX 13060 0 پىس .

SFX 13061 N 1
SFX 13061 0 تىۋەتتى .

SFX 13062 N 1
SFX 13062 0 ىرىمىزگە .

SFX 13063 N 1
SFX 13063 0 ۈشلىرىنى .

SFX 13064 N 1
SFX 13064 0 سىزلان .

SFX 13065 N 1
SFX 13065 0 دۈرۈشنى .

SFX 13066 N 1
SFX 13066 0 لىڭىزگە .

SFX 13067 N 1
SFX 13067 0 چەمنىڭ .

SFX 13068 N 1
SFX 13068 0 ىۋاتقىنى .

SFX 13069 N 1
SFX 13069 0 تلەن .

SFX 13070 N 1
SFX 13070 0 رمايلا .

SFX 13071 N 1
SFX 13071 0 ۋاش .

SFX 13072 N 1
SFX 13072 0 مىزدىكى .

SFX 13073 N 1
SFX 13073 0 ىگەن .

SFX 13074 N 1
SFX 13074 0 ىكىمىزگە .

SFX 13075 N 1
SFX 13075 0 غۇچىلارمۇ .

SFX 13076 N 1
SFX 13076 0 قلارغا .

SFX 13077 N 1
SFX 13077 0 غلىرى .

SFX 13078 N 1
SFX 13078 0 غۇز .

SFX 13079 N 1
SFX 13079 0 ىنىمىزدىلا .

SFX 13080 N 1
SFX 13080 0 ۇشى .

SFX 13081 N 1
SFX 13081 0 اشمىغان .

SFX 13082 N 1
SFX 13082 0 امىلەرنى .

SFX 13083 N 1
SFX 13083 0 ۇچىنىڭ .

SFX 13084 N 1
SFX 13084 0 ھاجى .

SFX 13085 N 1
SFX 13085 0 ۋېتىلمىگەن .

SFX 13086 N 1
SFX 13086 0 ېلىن .

SFX 13087 N 1
SFX 13087 0 لىكمۇ .

SFX 13088 N 1
SFX 13088 0 يەتكىمۇ .

SFX 13089 N 1
SFX 13089 0 رلىقنى .

SFX 13090 N 1
SFX 13090 0 سەدىقە .

SFX 13091 N 1
SFX 13091 0 لىشىدەك .

SFX 13092 N 1
SFX 13092 0 ردىم .

SFX 13093 N 1
SFX 13093 0 سادا .

SFX 13094 N 1
SFX 13094 0 ەنتى .

SFX 13095 N 1
SFX 13095 0 ىتىكەن .

SFX 13096 N 1
SFX 13096 0 تىمىزدىكى .

SFX 13097 N 1
SFX 13097 0 ككىنا .

SFX 13098 N 1
SFX 13098 0 زدۇر .

SFX 13099 N 1
SFX 13099 0 چىلىرىدىن .

SFX 13100 N 1
SFX 13100 0 قاندەك .

SFX 13101 N 1
SFX 13101 0 ۇشلار .

SFX 13102 N 1
SFX 13102 0 ىقنىڭمۇ .

SFX 13103 N 1
SFX 13103 0 مىڭغا .

SFX 13104 N 1
SFX 13104 0 زىيەنى .

SFX 13105 N 1
SFX 13105 0 ەكلەش .

SFX 13106 N 1
SFX 13106 0 بەرتۈرك .

SFX 13107 N 1
SFX 13107 0 يسىنى .

SFX 13108 N 1
SFX 13108 0 ەرلەرنى .

SFX 13109 N 1
SFX 13109 0 غۇچىلارنىڭ .
